Arkansas, session 2025, SB435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-13-101 is amended to read as follows:
5-13-101. Definition Definitions.
As used in this chapter,:
(1) "First “first responder” means a law enforcement officer,
firefighter, emergency medical provider, or emergency management official,
who is acting within the scope or course of his or her employment; and
(2)(A) "Healthcare worker" means a person who is employed by,
volunteers for, or contracts with a healthcare facility, organization, or
healthcare service provider and is involved in the delivery, support, or
administration of healthcare services, including without limitation:
(i) A physician;
(ii) A nurse;
(iii) A paramedic or other emergency responder;
(iv) A technician;
*JMB208*
03/11/2025 4:35:05 PM JMB208

SB435
(v) A pharmacist;
(vi) A dentist;
(vii) A healthcare aide or assistant;
(viii) A therapist;
(ix) A case manager or care coordinator working in a
healthcare setting; and
(x) Administrative staff, janitorial staff, security
staff, and food services staff who directly support healthcare operations.
(B) "Healthcare worker" is not limited by location and may
apply to a person working in any healthcare setting, including without
limitation a hospital, clinic, nursing home, rehabilitation center,
outpatient facility, home health agency, crime scenes, accident scenes, or
any other setting in which healthcare services are provided.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-13-202(a)(4)(E), concerning the criminal
offense of battery in the second degree, is amended to read as follows:
(E) While performing medical treatment or emergency
medical services or while in the course of other employment relating to his
or her medical training:
(i) A physician;
(ii) A person licensed as emergency medical services
personnel, as defined in § 20-13-202;
(iii) A licensed or certified healthcare
professional; or
(iv) Any other healthcare provider worker providing
services in support of medical treatment; or

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 13, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-13-215. Aggravated assault upon a healthcare worker.
(a) A person commits the offense of aggravated assault upon a
healthcare worker if he or she, under circumstances manifesting extreme
indifference to the personal hygiene and safety of the healthcare worker,
purposely engages in conduct that creates a potential danger of infection to
the healthcare worker while the healthcare worker is engaged in the course of
his or her employment by causing a person whom the actor knows to be a
03/11/2025 4:35:05 PM JMB208

SB435
healthcare worker to come into contact with saliva, blood, urine, feces,
seminal fluid, or other bodily fluid by purposely throwing, tossing,
expelling, or otherwise transferring the fluid or material.
(b) Aggravated assault upon a healthcare worker is a Class D felony.
(c) This section does not amend, modify, or affect:
(1) The provisions of § 9-27-318(g) or § 9-27-318(h)(2), which
require a finding to transfer a juvenile case to circuit court for
prosecution as an adult to be supported by clear and convincing evidence; or
(2) The provisions of §§ 5-2-327 and 5-2-328 governing the
determination of a defendant’s fitness to proceed in a criminal case.


























03/11/2025 4:35:05 PM JMB208